Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; FINANCIAL LITERACY GRANT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Junior Achievement North. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to Junior Achievement North to expand access to its financial literacy programming for elementary and secondary students: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The grant awarded under this section must be consistent with the procedures for evidence-based education grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 127A.20. new text end new text begin (c) Junior Achievement North must use the grant proceeds to expand the number of students who participate in Junior Achievement North's financial literacy programs, career readiness programs, and entrepreneurship programs with a focus on expanding opportunities for underserved students. To the extent possible, programming must be provided in an equitable manner to students in greater Minnesota. new text end new text begin (d) In addition to other reporting requirements, and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195, by February 1 of each year Junior Achievement North receives an appropriation, Junior Achievement North must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education on activities funded by this appropriation. The report must include but is not limited to: information about the operations of Junior Achievement North, including its most recent audit; a description of the financial literacy, career readiness, and entrepreneurship programs offered during the year; participation and demographic information about the students and schools served by the program; and a description of partnerships with other financial literacy organizations. new text end